Wyoming, session 2025, HB0238.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-9-113 and 22-26-101(a) by creating
a new paragraph (xii) are amended to read:

22-9-113. Completing and return of ballot; ballot
harvesting prohibited.

HB0238

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0651
(a) Upon receipt, a qualified elector shall mark the
ballot and sign the affidavit. The ballot shall then be
sealed in the inner ballot envelope and mailed or delivered
to the clerk subject to subsection (b) of this section.

(b) No person shall deliver a ballot to the clerk
unless the person is the qualified elector who is casting
the ballot or the person is immediate family of the
qualified elector. This subsection shall not apply to
ballots that are mailed to the clerk.

(c) If a county clerk, county canvassing board member
or other election official becomes aware of a violation of
subsection (b) of this section before ballot tabulation,
any ballot that is delivered in violation of subsection (b)
of this section shall not be tabulated.

22-26-101. Felony offenses generally.

(a) The following acts in connection with or related
to the election process or an election, if knowingly and
willfully committed, are felony offenses punishable by not
more than five (5) years' imprisonment in the state
HB0238

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0651
penitentiary or a fine of not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000.00), or both:

(xii) Violating W.S. 22-9-113(b).

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0238